District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “PrEP DC Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Prohibition of Discrimination in the Provision of Insurance Act of 1986,
effective August 7, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-132; D.C. Official Code § 31-1601 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 31-1601) is amended as follows:
(1) New paragraphs (2A) and (2B) are added to read as follows:
“(2A) “Baseline assessment” means any testing, as recommended by the U.S.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, to be completed before prescribing HIV prevention
medication, including screening tests for chlamydia, gonorrhea, syphilis, kidney function
assessments, hepatitis B virus serology, and lipid profiles.
“(2B) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance,
Securities, and Banking.”.
(2) A new paragraph (3B) is added to read as follows:
“(3B) “Health benefit plan” shall have the same meaning as provided in section
101(20) of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Federal Law Conformity and No-
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Fault Motor Vehicle Insurance Act of 1998, effective April 13, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-209; D.C.
Code § 31-3301.01(20)).”.
(3) New paragraphs (5A) and (5B) are added to read as follows:
“(5A) “HIV prevention services” means medical services to prevent HIV and
AIDS, including baseline assessments, initial and follow-up appointments and services,
medication for the management of side effects associated with PrEP and PEP, and medication
self-management or adherence counseling.
“(5B) “HIV prevention treatment” means medical treatment used to prevent HIV,
including PrEP, PEP, and HIV prevention services.”.
(4) New paragraphs (7A) and (7B) are added to read as follows:
“(7A) “PrEP” means pre-exposure prophylaxis antiretroviral medication approved
by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (“FDA”) used to prevent HIV in a person without
HIV.
“(7B) “PEP” means post-exposure prophylaxis antiretroviral medication approved
by the FDA used to prevent HIV in a person without HIV who may have been recently exposed
to HIV.”.
(b) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 31-1603) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b)(1) In determining whether to issue, cancel, or renew insurance coverage, an insurer
may not:
“(A) Use age, marital status, geographic area of residence, occupation,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any similar factor or combination of
factors for the purpose of seeking to predict whether any individual may in the future develop
AIDS or ARC; or
“(B) Take into consideration an individual’s use of HIV prevention
treatment when taken pursuant to a valid prescriber’s order.
“(2) In determining rates, premiums, dues, assessments, benefits covered, or
expenses reimbursable, or in any other aspect of insurance marketing or coverage, an insurer
may not:
“(A) Use age, marital status, geographic area of residence, occupation,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any similar factor or combination of
factors for the purpose of seeking to predict whether any individual may in the future develop
AIDS or ARC; or
“(B) Take into consideration an individual’s use of HIV prevention
treatment when taken pursuant to a valid prescriber’s order.”.
(2) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) No health or disability insurance policy or contract shall contain any exclusion,
reduction, other limitation of coverage, deductibles, or coinsurance provisions related to HIV
prevention treatment or the care and treatment of AIDS, ARC, HIV infection, or any illness or
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
disease arising from these medical conditions, unless the provisions apply generally to all
benefits under the policy or contract.”.
(c) Section 5 (D.C. Official Code § 31-1604) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “District of Columbia
Commissioner of Public Health (“Commissioner”)” and inserting the phrase “Director of the
Department of Health (“Director”)” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the word “Commissioner” and
inserting the word “Director” in its place.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(b)(1) A named insured who tests positive under the testing protocol certified by the
Director may appeal to the Commissioner to review the testing procedures and results, and may
present additional medical evidence, including the results of similar tests for exposure to the
probable causative agent of AIDS that the named insured independently obtains, to rebut the
positive test results. If the Commissioner determines that the result of the test of the proposed
insured is not a true positive, the Commissioner shall order the insurer from which the applicant
sought coverage to disregard the positive test result. The Commissioner shall, when necessary,
request the advice of the Director in making this determination.”.
(B) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the word “Commissioner” and
inserting the word “Director” in its place.
(d) Section 9 (D.C. Official Code § 31-1608) is amended by adding a new subsection (b-
1) to read as follows:
“(b-1) Any person who violates section 4 shall be fined not less than $1,000, and not
more than $10,000 for each violation.”.
(e) Section 10 (D.C. Official Code § 31-1609) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing text is designated as subsection (a).
(2) A new subsection (b) is added to read as follows:
“(b) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue
rules to implement the provisions of section 12.”.
(f) A new section 12 is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 12. Coverage for HIV prevention treatment.
“(a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, for health benefit
plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, an insurer may not impose cost sharing,
require prior authorization, or impose any medically unnecessary restrictions or delays for the
coverage of HIV prevention services, PEP, or any formulation of PrEP. “(b) Subsection (a) of
this section shall not apply to the extent that coverage without cost-sharing would disqualify an
individual receiving coverage under a high deductible health plan from eligibility for a health
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223.
“(c) No health benefit plan or insurer may use prescription information indicating the use
of HIV prevention treatment to medically underwrite premiums for specific enrollees.
“(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “medically unnecessary restrictions” means
step therapy, waiting periods, or preexisting condition exclusions.”.
Sec. 3. The Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of 2001, effective October
3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official Code § 7-731 et seq.), is amended by adding a new
section 4907g to read as follows:
“Sec. 4907g. DC Health and Wellness Center Fund.
“(a) There is established as a special fund the DC Health and Wellness Center Fund
(“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Department of Health in accordance with
subsection (c) of this section.
“(b) All payments made for services rendered at the DC Health and Wellness Center and
affiliated clinics shall be deposited in the Fund, including:
“(1) Payments received from third-party insurance reimbursements;
“(2) Out-of-pocket payments collected from individuals; and
“(3) Other collections.
“(c) Money in the Fund shall be used solely to support the operations of the DC Health
and Wellness Center and affiliated clinics.
“(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund, including any interest earned, but not
expended in a fiscal year shall not revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of
the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
5